Hawaii statutes.
[§174C-51.5] Dual line water supply
systems; installation in new industrial and commercial developments located in
designated water management areas. (a) The commission, as a condition for
issuing permits pursuant to this part, may require the use of dual line water
supply systems in new industrial and commercial developments located in
designated water management areas. The commission shall not require the use of
dual line water supply systems if:

(1) There is a threat to existing water quality or to
public health and safety, as determined by the department of health;

(2) A source of nonpotable water will not be
reasonably available in the near future as determined by the commission; or

(3) There is a serious threat to permitted ground or
surface water uses within a designated water management area as determined by
the commission.

(b) The county boards of water supply, in
consultation with the department of health, shall adopt standards for
nonpotable water distributed through dual line water supply systems, and rules
regarding the use of nonpotable water. The standards and rules shall be
adopted in accordance with chapter 91 and shall protect existing water quality
and the health and safety of the public.

(c) For the purposes of this section, the
term:

"Developments" means one or more
commercial or industrial subdivisions approved after May 30, 2000. It shall
not apply to any modification, addition to, or replacement of, any commercial
or industrial subdivision in existence prior to May 30, 2000.

"Dual line water supply system" means
a supply system that distributes potable and nonpotable water through parallel
but separate distribution lines. [L 2000, c 144, §2]

Revision Note

"May 30, 2000" substituted for "the effective
date of this Act".

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next